ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/de_CH/hyph_de_CH.dic
pt1z
p1m
p1pa
p1po
p1pi
pp1h
p1pe
p1z
pf1ri
pf1sa
p2fei
p1fe
p2fü
1py1
2z.
1zan1
za1ch
1zah
z1ab
1zau
z1aus
z1at
z1am
z1r
1zo
z2o1c
2z1op
z1n
1zi
zi1en
zi1es
zi2ga
zi1ta
z1s2
z1si1
zsu1
z1c
z1h
1ze
zer1ob
zer1k
ze1na
2z1en1ge
zen1t1r
2z1ent1w
3zei
zei2tr
2z1ef
z1b
zbe1
1zä
2z1äm
z1d
z1l
1zu
zu1a
zu1na
zu1ni
zu1nä
zu3s2
zu1b
zu1l
zu1gl
zu1k
z2u1t
z1u2m.
zu1z
zu1f2
z1g
z1ge1
1zü
z1k
zkapi1ta4
z1ka
zka1pi
2zt
z4t1end
z1te
z3ten
z1tä
z1tu
z1tü
z1m
z1p2
zpunk4
z1pu
z3pun
2zz
z1za
z1f
z1wo
zwor2
z1wel
1zwu
1zö
1zy1
1fa
2fa1b
fa2b1l
f1rar
f1rai
f1ra1s
fro2s
f1ric
1fo
fo1ru
fo1b
f1op
f1n
1fi
fis2
fi1en
fi2lei
fi1le
fi1ta
fit1r
fs1au
fs1ak
f2s1o
fs1s
f2s1ei
f1se
fs1un
fs1k
fs2t
f1sta
f1str
f1sto
f1s1ti
fs3tät
f1stä
f1spa
fsp2
fs1pre
f1spe
f1s2pu
f1c
f1h
1fe
fe2a
fe1ra
fer1st
fers2
f1er1l
f1er1w
fe1em
fel1st
f1b
1fä
fä1c
f1d
2flic
f2lu
1fu
3fug
2fum
f1g
fge1s2
f1ge
1fü
fü3s2s2e.
füs1se
f1üb
f1k
f1ta
ft1auf
f1tr
ft1ro
ft1rö
f1to
ft2s1i
f2ts
ft2s1e
ft1str
fts2t
fts1pa
ftsp2
f2t1ent
f1te
f3ten
f1tu
f1tü
ft1t
f1m
f1p
f1z
ff1l
f1w
2w.
1wah
wa1b
wa3ge
1wat
wo1r1a
wo1r1i
wo1r1u
wo1r1ü2
wo1che2
w2oc
1woh
wo1hi
woh2l1
wo1b
1wid
wi1ki
wi1th
2ws1
w1sk
1wer1du
wer2ta
wer2t2r
wei3s2se
wei3sc
wei1br
1weh
we2ba
we2br
we2b1s
wel2tu
1weg
we2g1r2
weg1l
1wäs
1wäl
w1d
wu2n2s
1wuc
1wüh
2wt
wö1c
1w1j
ö1ri
ö1re
ö1ru
ö1ni
ö1nu
ös1a
ö3se
ö1su
öh1re
öh1nu
ö1he
öh1l
ö1hu
ö1e
ö1be
2ödet
ö1de
ö2l
ög1l
ö2k
ö3ke
ö1tu
öpf1l
öf1l
ö1w
1j
ja1n
ja1c
ja2me
jo1a1
jo1ri
je2a
jes1t
jeg1
je2tr
je1t1u
ju1ni
jugen2
ju1ge
2jö
1ya2l.
y1r
y1na
y1n1o
yn1d
yn1t
y1sa1
y1s1h
ys3t
y1sp2
y1c
y1h
y1en
y1b
yb1r
y1d
y1lo
y1le
y1g
y1k
yk1l
yt2
y1ta
yp1r
y1po
y1pi
y1ph
y1pe
y1z
y1f
1q
qu2
x1a
1xan
x1o1d
1xi1o
xis1
1xi1b
1xik
1xit
x1s
1x2e.
1xer
1xen
1xes
x1em
1x1b
x1d
1xu1
x1g
x1k
xta2
x1t1r
xt2rat
x1to
xt1s2t
x2ts
x1tu
x1m
x1p
x1z
ß1/ss=,1,1
